Florida, session 2026, SB644.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 61.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to 31 read: 32 61.16âAttorney Attorneyâs fees, suit money, and costs.â 33 (1)âThe court may from time to time, after considering the 34 financial resources of both parties, order a party to pay a 35 reasonable amount for attorney attorneyâs fees, suit money, and 36 the cost to the other party of maintaining or defending any 37 proceeding seeking relief under this chapter, including 38 enforcement, and modification, and appellate proceedings and 39 appeals. 40 (2)âAn award of attorney fees, suit money, and costs, 41 whether temporary or final, may be awarded retroactively and 42 prospectively as equity requires. Attorney fees, suit money, and 43 costs incurred in pursuing an award of such fees, money, and 44 costs may be included in any award under this section. 45 (3)âIn those cases in which an action is brought for 46 enforcement and the court finds that the noncompliant party is 47 without justification in the refusal to follow a court order, 48 the court may not award attorney attorneyâs fees, suit money, 49 and costs to the noncompliant party in the enforcement action. 50 (4)âAn application for attorney attorneyâs fees, suit 51 money, or costs, whether temporary or final otherwise, may shall 52 not require corroborating expert testimony in order to support 53 an award under this chapter. 54 (5)âThe trial court has shall have continuing jurisdiction 55 to make temporary attorney attorneyâs fees and costs awards 56 reasonably necessary to prosecute or defend an appeal on the 57 same basis and criteria as though the matter were pending before 58 it at the trial level. 59 (6)âIn determining the amount of an award of attorney fees, 60 suit money, and costs, the court may consider whether a good 61 faith offer of settlement was rejected. 62 (7)(a)âIf a party directly engages in vexatious or bad 63 faith litigation, the court may: 64 1.âAward attorney fees, suit money, and costs as a sanction 65 against the opposing party; or 66 2.âDeny or reduce an award of attorney fees, suit money, 67 and costs to the offending party. 68 (b)âAn order entered under this subsection addressing 69 vexatious or bad faith litigation must include written findings 70 identifying the specific conduct the party engaged in and the 71 reasons the court granted, denied, or reduced such fees, money, 72 and costs In all cases, the court may order that the amount be 73 paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in that 74 attorneyâs name. 75 (8)âIn determining whether to make attorney attorneyâs fees 76 and costs awards at the appellate level, the court shall 77 primarily consider the relative financial resources of the 78 parties, unless an appellate partyâs cause is deemed to be 79 frivolous. 80 (9)âIn all cases, the court may order that the award of 81 attorney fees, suit money, and costs be paid directly to the 82 attorney, who may enforce such order in his or her name. 83 However, payment of support owed to the obligee has priority 84 over fees, costs, and expenses. 85 (10)âIn Title IV-D cases, attorney attorneyâs fees, suit 86 money, and costs, including filing fees, recording fees, 87 mediation costs, service of process fees, and other expenses 88 incurred by the clerk of the circuit court, shall be assessed 89 only against the nonprevailing obligor after the court makes a 90 determination of the nonprevailing obligorâs ability to pay such 91 costs and fees. The Department of Revenue may shall not be 92 considered a party for purposes of this section; however, fees 93 may be assessed against the department pursuant to s. 57.105(1). 94 (11)(2)âIn an action brought pursuant to Rule 3.840, 95 Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure, whether denominated direct 96 or indirect criminal contempt, the court may shall have 97 authority to: 98 (a)âAppoint an attorney to prosecute such said contempt. 99 (b)âAssess attorney attorneyâs fees and costs against the 100 contemnor contemptor after the court makes a determination of 101 the contemnorâs contemptorâs ability to pay such costs and fees. 102 (c)âOrder that the amount be paid directly to the attorney, 103 who may enforce the order in his or her name. 104 Section 2.âSection 742.045, Florida Statutes, is amended to 105 read: 106 742.045âAttorney Attorneyâs fees, suit money, and costs.â 107 (1)âThe court may from time to time, after considering the 108 financial resources of both parties, order a party to pay a 109 reasonable amount for attorney attorneyâs fees, suit money, and 110 the cost to the other party of maintaining or defending any 111 proceeding seeking relief under this chapter, including 112 enforcement, and modification, and appellate proceedings. 113 (2)âAn award of attorney fees, suit money, and costs, 114 whether temporary or final, may be awarded retroactively and 115 prospectively as equity requires. Attorney fees, suit money, and 116 costs incurred in pursuing an award of such fees, money, and 117 costs may be included in any award under this section. 118 (3)âIn those cases in which an action is brought for 119 enforcement and the court finds that the noncompliant party is 120 without justification in the refusal to follow a court order, 121 the court may not award attorney fees, suit money, and costs to 122 the noncompliant party in the enforcement action. 123 (4)âAn application for attorney attorneyâs fees, suit 124 money, or costs, whether temporary or final otherwise, may shall 125 not require corroborating expert testimony in order to support 126 an award under this chapter. 127 (5)âThe trial court has continuing jurisdiction to make 128 temporary attorney fees and costs awards reasonably necessary to 129 prosecute or defend an appeal on the same basis and criteria as 130 though the matter were pending before it at the trial level. 131 (6)âIn determining the amount of an award of attorney fees, 132 suit money, and costs, the court may consider whether a good 133 faith offer of settlement was rejected. 134 (7)(a)âIf a party directly engages in vexatious or bad 135 faith litigation, the court may: 136 1.âAward attorney fees, suit money, and costs as a sanction 137 against the opposing party; or 138 2.âDeny or reduce an award of attorney fees, suit money, 139 and costs to the offending party. 140 (b)âAn order entered under this subsection addressing 141 vexatious or bad faith litigation must include written findings 142 identifying the specific conduct the party engaged in and the 143 reasons the court granted, denied, or reduced such fees, money, 144 and costs. 145 (8)âIn determining whether to make attorney fees and costs 146 awards at the appellate level, the court shall primarily 147 consider the relative financial resources of the parties, unless 148 an appellate partyâs cause is deemed to be frivolous. 149 (9)âIn all cases, the court may order that the award of 150 attorney fees, suit money, and costs amount be paid directly to 151 the attorney, who may enforce the order in his or her name. 152 However, payment of support owed to the obligee has priority 153 over fees, costs, and expenses. 154 (10)âIn Title IV-D cases, attorney fees, suit money, and 155 any costs, including filing fees, recording fees, mediation 156 costs, service of process fees, and other expenses incurred by 157 the clerk of the circuit court, shall be assessed only against 158 the nonprevailing obligor after the court makes a determination 159 of the nonprevailing obligorâs ability to pay such costs and 160 fees. The Department of Revenue may shall not be considered a 161 party for purposes of this section; however, fees may be 162 assessed against the department pursuant to s. 57.105(1). 163 (11)âIn an action brought pursuant to Rule 3.840, Florida 164 Rules of Criminal Procedure, whether denominated direct or 165 indirect criminal contempt, the court may: 166 (a)âAppoint an attorney to prosecute such contempt. 167 (b)âAssess attorney fees and costs against the contemnor 168 after the court makes a determination of the contemnorâs ability 169 to pay such costs and fees. 170 (c)âOrder that the amount be paid directly to the attorney, 171 who may enforce the order in his or her name. 172 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.